Maryland, session 2025, HB0897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
2–114.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION, SHALL:
(1) ESTIMATE THE NUMBER OF ELECTRIC VEHICLES IN OPERATION
IN THE STATE NECESSARY TO ACHIEVE THE GOALS OF § 2–1205(C)(2) OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0897*

HOUSE BILL 897
(2) ESTIMATE THE NUMBER AND DETERMINE THE DENSITY AND
LOCATION OF PUBLIC AND PRIVATE ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING STATIONS
NECESSARY TO CONVENIENTLY SUSTAIN THE NUMBER OF VEHICLES ESTIMATED
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION:
(1) SHALL DEVELOP PLANS AND IMPLEMENT PROGRAMS TO
INCREASE THE ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING INFRASTRUCTURE NECESSARY TO
ACHIEVE THE GOALS OF § 2–1205(C)(2) OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE AND
SUPPORT THE NUMBER OF VEHICLES ESTIMATED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(2) MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE PLANS AND
PROGRAMS DEVELOPED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.